Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1555.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2142 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 2142. Payment Date and Discount.--Inheritance tax is due at the date of the decedent's death and shall become delinquent at the expiration of nine months after the decedent's death. To the extent that the inheritance tax is paid within three months after [the death of the decedent] the issuance of the notice under section 2140, a discount of five per cent shall be allowed.12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 2. This act shall apply to tax years after December 31, 2026.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1555PN1838 - 2 - 123